Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 1-4-401, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-4-401. A. The provisions of the Oklahoma Discovery


Code and the Rules for District Courts of Oklahoma do not apply to


juvenile proceedings except as provided by this section.


B. The court may order the parties to exchange information that


is not work product and not privileged, including:


1. The assessment and investigation records of the Department


of Human Services; provided, all information that identifies the


reporter of alleged child abuse or neglect shall be redacted;

Req. No. 687 Page 1


2. Law enforcement reports;


3. Any video or audio recording of an interview with the child


alleged to be deprived;


4. Any exhibit any party intends to introduce at trial; and


5. The names of any witnesses any party may call and a synopsis


of the expected testimony.


C. The court may in its discretion enter a scheduling order,


order mediation, and conduct status and settlement conferences as


needed during deprived proceedings.


D. All information produced, exchanged, or used during the


pendency of the deprived action is confidential and shall be subject


to a protective order. The disclosure or use of the information for


any other purpose is prohibited except as permitted by law For


purposes of this section:


1. “Confidential record” includes, but is not limited to, any


study, plan, recommendation, assessment, report, or other


information describing the history, diagnosis, condition, care,


treatment, or custody regarding a child, or safety analysis records


that have been prepared and obtained in response to a report of


alleged child abuse or neglect and include assessment reports and


any other reports to the district attorney with all supporting


documentation attached and any addendums;


2. “Party” means:


a. a parent or legal guardian,

Req. No. 687 Page 2


b. the child, and


c. the guardian ad litem, if any; and


3. “Record” means any written or printed document, paper, form,


log, report, file, or note and any film, photograph, audio tape


recording, visual tape recording, or computer tape or disk, or


information entered into and maintained in an automated or


computerized information system.


C. 1. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that full


disclosure of information to the parties in juvenile proceedings is


in the best interests of the child. Such presumption may only be


rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence.


2. Unless the court, by a preponderance of the evidence, finds


such disclosure is not in the best interests of the child, the court


shall enter an order which discloses to all parties in the case all


records that are necessary and relevant to the court’s determination


of the best interests of the child, including any records and


documents from the Department of Human Services, law enforcement,


any state agency, or any private organization with information


relevant to the juvenile proceedings. The court order shall be of


the nature of a protective order, prohibiting the parties in the


juvenile proceedings from disclosing the records to third parties,


and any information that identifies the reporter of alleged child


abuse or neglect shall be redacted.



Req. No. 687 Page 3


D. The disclosure shall include all records as defined by


Section 1-6-102 of this title including, but not limited to:


1. Written or printed documents;


2. Papers, logs, and reports, including safety analysis


reports;


3. Files and case notes;


4. Medical records, including any psychological evaluations or


assessments;


5. Forensic interviews, including any transcripts or notes


related to these interviews;


6. Films, photographs, and audio or visual tape recordings;


7. Handwritten or handprinted notes;


8. Any and all evidence provided by collateral references or


individuals responsible for the child’s welfare;


9. Information entered into and maintained in automated or


computerized information systems, specifically Kids Integrated Data


System (KIDS) and OnBase;


10. All communication within the Department of Human Services


regarding the case, including, but not limited to, Microsoft Teams


communications, e-KIDS system entries, and OnBase documentation;


11. Any and all correspondence related to investigations of


child abuse or neglect allegations;





Req. No. 687 Page 4


12. Records of any assessments, safety plans, or case


management documents prepared in response to child abuse and neglect


allegations;


13. All communication between the Department of Human Services


and the parties, law enforcement, medical professionals, and any


other third party relevant to the juvenile proceeding;


14. Documentation of any services provided or referrals made to


the family or child involved;


15. Records of any home visits, observations, or interactions


with the child or his or her family;


16. Documentation of any case reviews or meetings held


regarding the child’s case;


17. All KIDS contact entries and any and all OnBase records


related to the case, or the equivalent information systems’ entries


and records;


18. Text messages and emails exchanged between Department of


Human Services personnel concerning the case;


19. Phone records and call logs pertaining to communications


related to the case;


20. Any exhibit any party intends to introduce at trial; and


21. The names of any witnesses any party may call and a


synopsis of the expected testimony.


E. In addition to the court’s order from paragraph 2 of


subsection C of this section, the court may also, in its discretion,

Req. No. 687 Page 5


enter a scheduling order, order mediation, and conduct status and


settlement conferences as needed during deprived proceedings.


F. All information produced, exchanged, or used during the


pendency of the deprived action shall be confidential and shall be


subject to a protective order. The disclosure or use of the


information for any other purpose is prohibited except as permitted


by law.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-687 TEK 1/16/2025 3:44:17 PM





























Req. No. 687 Page 6